fr: Type de vanne: Presta; Schrader; Woods; Autre
hu: Szelep típusa: Presta; Schrader; Woods; Egyéb
nl: Ventieltype: Presta; Schrader; Dunlopventiel; Andere
pt-PT: Tipo de válvula: Presta; Schrader; Woods; Outro
ko: 밸브 유형: 프레스타; 슈레이더; 숲; 기타
it: Tipo di valvola: Presta; Schrader; Woods; Altro
zh-CN: 阀门类型: 法式气门嘴; 美式气门嘴; 木; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta ventila: Presta; Schrader; Tlačno; Drugo
vi: Loại van: Presta; Schrader; Dunlop; Khác
bg-BG: Тип клапан: Presta; Schrader; Woods; Други
en: Valve type: Presta; Schrader; Woods; Other
th: ประเภทวาล์ว: วาล์วจุ๊บหัวเล็ก; วาล์วจุ๊บหัวใหญ่; ไม้ต่างๆ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Vožtuvo tipas: „Presta“; „Schrader“; „Woods“; Kita
de: Ventiltyp: Presta; Schrader; Wald; Sonstiges
el: Τύπος βαλβίδας: Πρέστα; Schrader; Δασάκι; Άλλο
sv: Ventiltyp: Presta; Schräder; Woods; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta ventila: Presta; Schrader; Dunlop; Ostalo
ru: Тип клапана: Преста; Шрейдер; Вудса; Другой
fi: Venttiilityyppi: Presta; Schrader; Dunlop; Muu
pl: Typ zaworu: Presta; Schrader; Elementy drewniane; Inne
sk-SK: Typ ventilu: Presta; Schrader; Dunlop; Iné
ja: バルブの種類: プレスタ; シュレーダー; 木製; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de válvula: Presta; Schrader; Madeiras; Outro
cs: Typ ventilu: Presta; Schrader; Dunlopův; Jiné
es: Tipo de válvula: Presta; Schrader; Maderas; Otros
zh-TW: 閥門類型: 法式; 美式; 英式; 其他
da: Ventiltype: Presta; Schrader; Træ; Andet
nb: Ventiltype: Presta; Schrader; Woods; Annet
ro-RO: Tip supapă: Presta; Schrader; Woods; Altele
tr: Vana Tipi: Presta vanası; Schrader vanası; Dunlop; Diğer